dictsource/crh_rules
// This file in UTF8 encoded.
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Crimean Tatar

.replace
        а	a
        б	b
        к	c
        д	d
        е	e
        ф	f
        г	g
        х	h
        и	i
        ж	j
        л	l
        м	m	
        н	n
        нъ      ñ
        о	o
        п	p
        къ      q
        р	r
        с	s
        т	t
        у	u
        в	v
        ш	ş
        з	z
        ё	yo
        й	y
        ц	ts
        ч	ç
        щ	şç
        ы	ı
        э	e
        ю	yu
        я	ya
        
.group a
        a   a
        
.group b
        b   b
        
.group c
        c   dZ
        
.group ç
        ç   tS
         
.group d
        d    d
        
.group e
        e    e
        
.group f
        f    f
        
.group g
        g    g
        
.group ğ
        ğ    X
        
.group h
        h    h
        
.group ı 
        i    @
        
.group i
        i    i
        
.group j 
        j    Z
        
.group k
        k    k
        
.group l
        l    l
        
.group m
        m    m
        
.group n
        n    n
        
.group ñ
        ñ    N
        
.group o
        o    o
        
.group ö
        ö    W
        
.group p
        p    p
        
.group q
        q    q
        
.group r
        r    r
        
.group s
        s    s
        
.group ş
        ş    S
        
.group t
        t    t
        
.group u
        u    u
        
.group ü
        ü    y
        
.group v
        v    v
       
.group y 
        y    j
        
.group z
        z    z
